Hawaii statutes.
[§200-10.5] Sailing school vessels;
rules. The department shall adopt rules for the regulation and operation
of sailing school vessels. Until the rules are adopted, sailing school vessels
shall be classified as recreational vessels and subject to rules adopted under
sections 200-4 and 200-9 that pertain to recreational vessels; provided that
sailing school vessels shall be exempt from:

(1) All requirements for permits and fees; and

(2) All rules pertaining to:

(A) Mooring or anchoring of recreational
vessels at any offshore mooring area; and

(B) Living aboard a vessel while the vessel
is moored within ocean waters of the State. [L 1996, c 188, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next